Tennessee, session 114, SB0488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-21-314, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-21-103(3)(A), is amended by
deleting the language "or to vacate and close the structure as a place of human occupation or
use".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0488
000901
- 1 -